District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.03

Articles of dissolution.

(a)

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the Mayor for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

(1)

The name of the corporation;

(2)

The date dissolution was authorized; and

(3)

If dissolution was approved by the shareholders, a statement that the proposal to dissolve was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by this chapter and by the articles of incorporation.

(b)

A corporation shall be dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

(c)

For purposes of this part, the term “dissolved corporation” means a corporation whose articles of dissolution have become effective and includes a successor entity to which the remaining assets of the corporation are transferred subject to its liabilities for purposes of liquidation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-312.04, § 29-312.24, and § 29-516.

Section References